Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 90

STATE
POLICY CONCERNING THE UTILIZATION OF

VOLUNTEER
SERVICES

Section

90-1 Definitions

90-2 Scope of chapter; status of volunteers

90-3 Rights, responsibilities, and expectations
in

volunteer relationships

90-4 Volunteer benefits

90-5 Agency reports, required information

Cross References

Volunteer emergency
medical disaster response personnel, see §321-23.

Volunteer service
(immunity), see chapter 662D.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next